dictsource/sk_rules
// translation rules for Slovak
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Letter groups:
// G   voiced: bdgjlmnrvwzaeiouy

.group a
        a        a

.group á
        á        a:

.group ä
        ä        e

.group b
        b        b
        b (_     p
        b (_G    b

     _) bez (-P4  'bes
     _) bezo (-P5 'bezo

.group c
        c        ts
        ch       x

.group č
        č        tS

.group d
        d        d
        d (_     t
        d (_G    d
        d (e     d;
        d (i     d;
        d (í     d;
        d (eT    d     // word has $alt attribute
        d (iT    d
        d (íT    d
        dz       dz
        dz (_    ts
        dz (_G   dz
        dž       dZ
        dž (_    tS
        dž (_G   dZ

         d (istic    d
      _) d (ekor     d
      _) d (eleg     d
      _) d (elim     d
      _) d (epres    d
      _) d (eviz     d
      _) d (ivíz     d
   _han) d (i        d
_korešpon) d (en     d
    _na) d (íd       d
    _na) d (íď       d
   _pre) d (izb      d
_štandar) d (iz      d
    _vi) d (ea       d
    _vi) d (eo       d
    _vi) d (eu       d
      a) d (e        d
     in) d (i        d
    man) d (it       d
     mé) d (i        d
     mo) d (er       d
     or) d (i        d
 _prezi) d (ent      d
      _) d (etektí   d
      _) d (iftín    d
         d (izmus    d
     _i) d (enti     d
   _pre) d (iš       d
      _) d (efinitív d
     _o) d (iš       d
         d (idakti   d
    _mo) d (i        d
     _o) d (in       d
     _o) d (is       d
      _) d (iec      d
      _) d (iet      t
   _štú) d (i        d
   melo) d (i        d
    _mo) d (el       d
    _mo) d (em       d
    _fe) d (er       d
   _evi) d (en       d
      _) d (isk      d
     _e) d (it       d
  _skan) d (i        d
_invali) d (iz       d
  _meto) d (i        d
      _) d (einte    d
      _) d (ekád     d
    _in) d (ex       d
    tra) d (i        d
      _) d (imen     d
   _šta) d (i        d
      _) d (iá       d
      _) d (ié       d
      _) d (ez       d
      _) d (etail    d
     me) d (i        d
      _) d (ekór     d
      _) d (ia       d
      _) d (ig       d
      _) d (ip       d
      _) d (is       d
         d (ef       d
         d (ió       d
         d (etek     d
         d (if       d
         d (io       d
         d (ir       d
   _štá) d (i        d
    _au) d (i        d
         d (ick      d
      o) d (ic       d
      o) d (ik       d
      _) d (ekrét    d
    _po) d (íď       d
         d (ik_      d
_invali) d (it       d
    _po) d (íd       d
         d (ikt      d
         d (eterm    d
         d (isp      d
         d (ist      d
   _štu) d (i        d
_štipen) d (i        d
     _i) d (eá       d
    kre) d (i        d
    _ra) d (ikál     d
     _i) d (ea       d
      _) d (evíz     d
      i) d (en       d
      i) d (eo       d
     _i) d (il       d
     _i) d (io       d
    _ko) d (ifi      d
  _expe) d (i        d
   meló) d (i        d
      _) d (esig     d
   _tra) d (í        d
   _štu) d (en       d
    _au) d (i        d
      _) d (esti     d
         d (iskre    d
 diskre) d (i        d
    _ka) d (et       d
         d (eci      d
      _) d (ece      d
         d (isku     d
   _pre) d (íď       d
   _pre) d (íd       d
      _) d (ekrement d
     _o) d (íď       d


.group ď
        ď        d;
        ď (_     t;
        ď (_G    d;

.group e
        e        e

.group é
        é        e:

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        g (_     k
        g (_G    g

.group h
        h        h
        h (_     x
        h (_G    h

.group i
        i        i
        ia       %ia
        ie       %ie
        iu       %iu

.group í
        í        i:

.group j
        j        j

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l
     K) l (K     l-

.group ĺ
        ĺ        l:

.group ľ
        ľ        l^

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        n (g     N
        n (k     N
        n (e     n^
        n (i     n^
        n (í     n^
        n (eT    n    // word has $alt attribute from sk_list
        n (iT    n
        n (íT    n
    @C) n (ej_   n

     _) na (-P3  'na   // include $alt2 words as stressed prefixes

         n (ent    n
    _be) n (ef     n
  _bota) n (i      n
    _fo) n (e      n
    _gé) n (i      n
  _kolo) n (i      n
    _li) n (e      n
 _miest) n (e      n
    _mu) n (i      n
  _part) n (er     n
_personál) n (e    n
 _prázd) n (e      n
    _tu) n (is     n
   _vin) n (e      n
  _žiad) n (e      n
      a) n (im     n
     ál) n (i      n
     fó) n (i      n
     fo) n (ic     n
     ge) n (e      n
     go) n (i      n
  harmó) n (i      n
     ch) n (ic     n
     ch) n (ik     n
     ma) n (i      n
    mag) n (e      n
         n (eho_   n
   orga) n (iz     n
     ro) n (ic     n
     ro) n (ik     n
 sociál) n (e      n
  správ) n (e      n
    tro) n (i      n
   vole) n (í      n
     _e) n (erg    n
  inter) n (e      n
  _defi) n (itív   n
_aktuál) n (e      n
    _mo) n (i      n
    _re) n (es     n
   _tré) n (er     n
  _defi) n (íc     n
  endro) n (i      n
  _komu) n (i      n
      _) n (eón    n
_kultúr) n (e      n
      _) n (egatív n
      _) n (egác   n
      _) n (eoklas n
    _me) n (ež     n
    tré) n (i      n
      _) n (eutrál n
  harmo) n (i      n
    _te) n (is     n
      _) n (ikot   n
     lí) n (i      n
_konkrét) n (e     n
 _matki) n (e      n
   _sig) n (i      n
  _tech) n (i      n
     gó) n (i      n
  _reál) n (e      n
      i) n (ici    n
         n (ist    n
      _) n (eg     n
     mu) n (ik     n
     mu) n (is     n
   tago) n (is     n
    rôz) n (e      n
 _mecha) n (i      n
  _koló) n (i      n
      _) n (eoprén n
    _mi) n (i      n
    _ge) n (i      n
   _imu) n (i      n
_špeciál) n (e     n
      o) n (ic     n
      o) n (ik     n
      o) n (is     n
  _admi) n (ist     n
_administratív) n (e n
         n (izmus_ n
   _váž) n (e      n
 formál) n (e      n
  _štát) n (e      n
   štát) n (e_     n
   riad) n (e      n
    _pa) n (el     n
      _) n (eore   n
      _) n (erv    n
  natív) n (e      n
      _) n (ext    n
    zva) n (ej_    n
     _u) n (i      n

.group ň
        ň        n^

.group o
        o        o
//        ou (_    ow
        ou       oU

.group ó
        ó        o:

.group ô
        ô        uo

.group p
        p        p

     _) po (-P3   'po
     _) pod (-P4  'pot
     _) pri (-P4  'pRi

.group q
        q        k
        qu       kv

.group r
//        r        r
//     A) r (A     *
//     C) r (A     @-*
//        rr       *r

     K) r (K     r-
        r        R
        rr       R


.group ŕ
        ŕ        r:

.group ř        // Czech r-caron
        ř        R^
     p) ř        R^/   // quieter after unvoiced consonant
     f) ř        R^/
     t) ř        R^/
     k) ř        R^/


.group s
        s        s

     _) so (-P3  'so

.group š
        š        S

.group t
        t        t
        t (e     t;
        t (i     t;
        t (í     t;
        t (eT    t       // word has $alt attribute
        t (iT    t
        t (íT    t

      _) t (erestri  t

         t (ik_   t
         t (ing   t
         t (ist   t
 _atlan) t (i       t
_automa) t (i       t
   _cer) t (i       t
 _herme) t (i       t
   _ins) t (i       t
_konkre) t (iz      t
  _konš) t (i       t
 _kozme) t (i       t
_matema) t (i       t
 _sensi) t (i       t
   _ver) t (i       t
      a) t (in      t
      a) t (iz      t
     ak) t (i       t
    ama) t (ic      t
    ama) t (ik      t
     an) t (i       t
     as) t (ic      t
     ro) t (ic      t
     ro) t (ik      t
 komple) t (iz      t
     ma) t (ick     t
     op) t (i       t
    par) t (i       t
         t (ick     t
     rk) t (i       t
    _sa) t (ir      t
    _sa) t (is      t
  _iden) t (i       t
   _exo) t (i       t
   pres) t (iž      t
_farmaceu) t (i     t
     os) t (ic      t
_diagnos) t (i      t
     _s) t (imul    t
  didak) t (i       t
   _kon) t (i       t
      i) t (ic      t
 _synte) t (i       t
   _abs) t (i       t
      _) t (iran    t
   _reš) t (i       t
   _tex) t (il      t
    _pu) t (ik      t
      o) t (ic      t
      o) t (ik      t
    ven) t (il      t
     ak) t (ik      t
 _magne) t (i       t
     ma) t (ik      t
      e) t (ic      t
      e) t (ik      t
_preven) t (ív      t
   _inš) t (i       t
 _deinš) t (i       t
         t (izmus_  t
   tema) t (i       t
  inves) t (i       t
     ek) t (í       t
 _balis) t (i       t
     ek) t (i       t
     en) t (in      t
      a) t (ick     t
_produk) t (i       t
      _) t (itan    t
  _fone) t (i       t
  _niko) t (i       t
   _šta) t (i       t
_štatis) t (i       t
    cha) t (ic      t
    cha) t (ik      t
     li) t (ic      t
      _) t (itul    t
   _kul) t (i       t
   _kri) t (ic      t
   _kri) t (ik      t
   _kri) t (iz      t
   _apa) t (i       t
  _chao) t (ic      t
  _chao) t (ik      t
     ep) t (ic      t
     ep) t (ik      t
_charakteris) t (i  t
_charakteris) t (ík t
     _š) t (ipendi  t
   _cen) t (i       t
    _ak) t (iv      t
      ý) t (ic      t
     mo) t (iv      t
      s) t (ic      t
      n) t (ic      t
      n) t (in      t
   _mul) t (i       t
  _kons) t (i       t
   _jus) t (i       t
      i) t (ik      t
   _des) t (i       t
    _an) t (i       t
_antipa) t (i       t
    ema) t (i       t
      _) t (imotej  t
      a) t (iká     t

 _sensi) tí         ti:
   _dif) tí (n      ti:
      _) tí (mov    ti:
_defini) tí (v      ti:
    _ak) tí (v      ti:
 _detek) tí         ti:
     mo) tí (v      ti:
 _pales) tí (       ti:
  _nega) tí (v      ti:
      i) tí (v      ti:
      a) tí (v      ti:
  _audi) tí (v      ti:
     or) tí (m      ti:
   spek) tí (v      ti:
_produk) tí (v      ti:
_alterna) tí (v     ti:
_konštruk) tí (v    ti:
   _jus) tí         ti:
  viknu) tí         ti:
   ales) tí (t      ti:



.group te
      _) te (letext te
      _) te (rap    te
      _) te (ras    te
      _) te (rez    te
  _exis) te (n      te
    _ho) te (l      te
_charak) te (r      te
    _in) te (l      te
    _in) te (n      te
 _kompe) te (n      te
    _ma) te (mati   te
    _ma) te (ria    te
    _ma) te (riá    te
  _stra) te (g      te
     ia) te (_      te
     me) te (r_     te
      v) te (dajš   te
  zavia) te (       te
    _de) te (ktí    te
      _) te (ó      te
     in) te (rne    te
      _) te (o      te
         te (x      te
      _) te (lec    te
      _) te (lef    te
      _) te (leg    te
      _) te (lek    te
      _) te (lem    te
      _) te (leo    te
      _) te (lep    te
    _al) te (r      te
      _) te (ler    te
      _) te (lev    te
      _) te (lex    te
   _syn) te (ti     te
   _wal) te (r      te
      _) te (ch     te
      _) te (x      te
         te (rajš   te
      _) te (mp     te
      _) te (nd     te
      _) te (rč     te
      _) te (dajš   te
     _s) te (p      te
 _archi) te (k      te
   _pas) te         te
    _pa) te (nt     te
         te (mati   te
  _dein) te (       te
   _sep) te (mb     te
     _é) te (r      te
  _asis) te (n      te
      _) te (nis    te
    nás) te (_      te
   _vše) te (č      te
      _) te (rén    te
      _) te (réz    te
     de) te (k      te
         te (ho_    te
      _) te (nto    te
      s) te (r_     te
    _ka) te (d      te
    _ka) te (g      te
      _) te (lesk   te
         te (raz    te
      _) te (lesen  te
    _ka) te (ch     te
    _al) te (rnatív te
     de) te (rm     te
_charak) te (r      te
         te (j_     te
         te (s_     te
      s) te (r      te
         te (rm     te
         te (st     te
     ex) te (r      te
      _) te (leter  te
  _tele) te (r      te
    _po) te (n      te
     in) te (r      te
   _sys) te (m      te
    _al) te (rn     te
   _syn) te (       te
    _li) te (r      te


.group ť
        ť        t;

.group u
        u        u

.group ú
        ú        u:
